Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2303
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the One-Call Notification System Act, the definitions found in sections 76-2303.01 to 76-2317 shall be used.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB589, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB462, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB683, § 5.